New York, session 2025-2026, A3070.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 170-i 2 to read as follows: 3 § 170-i. State-funded and state-sponsored travel. 1. Notwithstanding 4 any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, all agencies, departments, 5 boards, divisions, authorities and commissions shall review all requests 6 for state-funded or state-sponsored travel to a state that, after Janu- 7 ary first, two thousand twenty-six, have discriminatory laws for access 8 to reproductive health services, including but not limited to, limita- 9 tions on access to abortions after six weeks of pregnancy. 10 2. Any such publicly funded or publicly sponsored travel to such a 11 location, unless such travel is necessary for the enforcement of New 12 York state law, to meet prior contractual obligations, or for the 13 protection of public health, welfare, and safety, or is otherwise in the 14 interest of the state, is suspended. 15 3. The attorney general shall develop, maintain, and post on their 16 website a current list of states that, after January first, two thousand 17 twenty-six, have discriminatory laws for access to reproductive health 18 services, including but not limited to, limitations on access to 19 abortions after six weeks of pregnancy. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06079-01-5